Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMMUNITY RESILIENCE MEMORIAL.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of Minneapolis to design, commission, construct, furnish, and install a public memorial honoring Renée Good and Alex Pretti, whose deaths prompted public dialogue regarding civil rights, public safety, and the protection of community members during federal immigration enforcement operations in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) The memorial must include: new text end new text begin (1) public art installations or statues commemorating Renée Good and Alex Pretti; new text end new text begin (2) educational exhibits, interpretive signage, or digital materials documenting the events and their significance in Minnesota's civic history; and new text end new text begin (3) reflection space for community gathering, dialogue, and remembrance. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Community partnerships. new text end new text begin The city of Minneapolis must develop the memorial through a community engagement process involving local residents, civil rights organizations, artists and historians, community cultural institutions, and immigrant community leaders. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Project oversight. new text end new text begin The memorial project must be overseen by a partnership that includes the city of Minneapolis; one member of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house; one member of the senate, appointed by the Committee on Rules and Administration; and representatives of community organizations and cultural institutions. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Matching contributions. new text end new text begin The city of Minneapolis may accept private donations, philanthropic contributions, and nonprofit partnerships to support the design, programming, and long-term maintenance of the memorial. new text end